Utah statutes.
17B-1-401.   Definitions.
For purposes of this part:
(1)  "Applicable area" means:
(a)  for a county, the unincorporated area of the county that is included
within the area proposed for annexation; or
(b)  for a municipality, the area of the municipality that is included within
the area proposed for annexation.
(2)  "Retail" means, with respect to a service provided by a municipality or
local district, that the service is provided directly to the ultimate user.
(3)  "Wholesale" means, with respect to a service provided by a local
district, that the service is not provided directly to the ultimate user but
is provided to a retail provider.
